Hawaii statutes.
§291C-135 Tow trucks; signage and insurance
requirements. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the
registered owner or lessee of a tow truck shall:

(1) Permanently affix on each door of the truck a
sign with the name and telephone number of the tow business. The letters and
numbers used in the sign shall be no less than two inches in height; and

(2) Maintain insurance in the following amounts:

(A) Bodily injury of not less than $500,000;

(B) Property damage of not less than
$200,000; and

(C) On-hook coverage of not less than
$175,000; or

(D) A combined single limit of liability of
not less than $1,000,000,

to protect owners of towed vehicles in the event
of vehicle loss or damage due to towing or bodily injury in the course of towing.
If a tow operator fails to comply with the insurance requirements of this
section, no charges, including storage charges, may be collected by the tow
operator as a result of the tow or as a condition of the release of the towed
vehicle. Any person, including the registered owner, lien holder, or insurer
of the vehicle, who has been injured by the tow operator's failure to comply
with this section is entitled to sue for damages sustained. If a judgment is
obtained by the plaintiff, the court shall award the plaintiff a sum of not
less than $1,000 or threefold damages sustained by the plaintiff, whichever sum
is greater, and reasonable attorney's fees and costs.

This section shall not apply to a county that has
adopted ordinances regulating towing operations. [L 2000, c 260, §1; am L 2003,
c 84, §4; am L 2010, c 122, §3]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next